Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 4
ROADSIDE ADVERTISING

Editor's note:

This part 4 was numbered as article 18 of chapter 120, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this part were repealed and reenacted in 1981, causing some addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 4 prior to 1981, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973, beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For regulation of advertising on county roads, see §§ 43-2-139 and 43-2-141.

43-1-401. Short title.

This part 4 shall be known and may be cited as the "Outdoor Advertising Act".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2006, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-401 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-402. Legislative declaration.

It is declared to be the purpose of the general assembly in the passage of this part 4 to control the existing and future use of advertising devices in areas adjacent to the state highway system in order to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the traveling public and the people of Colorado and such purposes are declared to be of statewide concern. The general assembly finds and declares that the enactment of this part 4 is necessary to further the following substantial state interests:

Protection of the public investment in the state highway system;

Promotion of safety upon the state highway system;

Promotion of the recreational value of public travel;

Promotion of public pride and spirit both on a statewide and local basis;

Preservation and enhancement of the natural and scenic beauty of this state;

Broadening the economic well-being and general welfare by attracting to this state tourists and other travelers;

Providing the traveling public with information as to necessary goods and services in the immediate vicinity of the traveler;

Protection and encouragement of local tourist-related businesses for the general economic well-being of this state;

Insuring that Colorado receives its full share of funds to be apportioned by the congress of the United States for expenditures on federal-aid highways.

In furtherance of the substantial state interests stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), it is the intent of the general assembly that Colorado comply with the federal "Highway Beautification Act of 1965" and rules and regulations adopted thereunder.

The general assembly further finds and declares that this part 4, taken as a whole, represents a balancing of the above-stated substantial state interests.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2006, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-407 as it existed prior to 1981.

Cross references:

For the "Highway Beautification Act of 1965", see Pub.L. 89-285, codified at 23 U.S.C. § 131 et seq.

43-1-403. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advertising device" means any outdoor sign, display, device, figure, painting, drawing, message, placard, poster, billboard, or any other contrivance designed, intended, or used to advertise or inform, for which compensation is directly or indirectly paid or earned in exchange for its erection or existence by any person or entity, and having the capacity of being visible from the travel way of any state highway, except any advertising device on a vehicle using the highway or any advertising device that is part of a comprehensive development. The term "vehicle using the highway" does not include any vehicle parked near said highway for advertising purposes.

(1.3) "Compensation" means the exchange of anything of value, including money, securities, real property interests, personal property interests, goods or services, promise of future development, exchange of favor, or forbearance of debt.

(1.5) (a) "Comprehensive development" means a group of two or more lots or parcels of land used primarily for multiple separate commercial or industrial activities that:

Is located entirely on one side of a highway;

Consists of lots or parcels that are contiguous except for public or private roadways or driveways that provide access to the development;

Has been approved by the relevant local government as a development with a common identity and plan for public and private improvements;

Has common areas such as parking, amenities, and landscaping; and

Has an approved plan of common ownership in which the owners have recorded irrevocable rights to use common areas and that provides for the management and maintenance of common areas.

"Comprehensive development" includes all land used or to be used or occupied for the activities of the development, including buildings, parking, storage and service areas, streets, driveways, and reasonably necessary landscaped areas. A comprehensive development includes only land that is used for a purpose reasonably related to the activities of the development.

"Defined area" means a geographically described economic area in which tourist-related businesses are located, which area would suffer substantial economic hardship by the removal of any tourist-related advertising device in that area providing directional information about goods and services in the interest of the traveling public.

"Department" means the department of transportation.

Repealed.

"Erect" means to construct or allow to be constructed.

"Highway" means any road on the state highway system, as defined in section 43-2-101 (1).

"Informational site" means an area established and maintained within a highway rest area wherein panels for the display of advertising and informational plaques may be erected and maintained so as not to be visible from the travel way of any state highway.

"Interstate system" means the system of highways as defined in section 43-2-101 (2).

"Maintain" means to preserve, keep in repair, continue, or replace an advertising device.

"Municipality" has the same meaning as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S.

"National policy" means the provisions relating to control of advertising, signs, displays, and devices adjacent to the interstate system contained in 23 U.S.C. sec. 131 and the national standards or regulations promulgated pursuant to such provisions.

"Nonconforming advertising device" means any advertising device that was lawfully erected under state law and has been lawfully maintained in accordance with the provisions of this part 4 or prior state law, except those advertising devices allowed by section 43-1-404 (1).

Repealed.

"Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, or organized group of persons, whether incorporated or not, and any government, governmental subdivision, or agency thereof.

"Tourist-related advertising device" means any legally erected and maintained advertising device which was in existence on May 5, 1976, and which provides directional information about goods and services in the interest of the traveling public limited to the following: Lodging, campsite, food service, recreational facility, tourist attraction, educational or historical site or feature, scenic attraction, gasoline station, or garage.

"Visible" means capable of being seen, whether or not legible, without visual aid by a person of normal acuity.

"Would work or suffer a substantial economic hardship" means tending to cause or causing a significant negative economic effect, such as a loss of business income, an increase in unemployment, a reduction in sales taxes or other revenue to the state or other governmental entity, a reduction in real estate taxes to the county, and other significant negative economic factors.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2007, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 1096, § 117, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 776, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2006:

(1.5) added and (14) amended, p. 78, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(12) amended, p. 256, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

(1) and (1.5)(b) amended, (1.3) added, and (4), (13), and (14) repealed, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2588, § 1, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-402 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-404. Advertising devices allowed - exception - legislative declaration.

The following advertising devices as defined in section 43-1-403 may be erected and maintained when in compliance with all provisions of this part 4 and the rules adopted by the department:

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Advertising devices located in areas which were zoned for industrial or commercial uses under authority of state law prior to January 1, 1970;

Advertising devices located along primary and secondary highways in areas which were zoned for industrial or commercial uses under authority of state law on and after January 1, 1970, provided:

The advertising device shall be no larger than one hundred fifty square feet; and

The advertising device must be located within one thousand feet of an industrial or commercial building.

Repealed.

In enacting the provisions of this paragraph (e), the general assembly declares each and every provision is necessary and not severable in order to further the substantial state interests contained in section 43-1-402. It is not the intent of the general assembly to allow advertising devices in areas zoned for industrial or commercial uses on or after January 1, 1970, unless each and every provision contained in this paragraph (e) is satisfied.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with the exception of section 43-1-416, any advertising device, except for a nonconforming advertising device, may contain a message center display with movable parts and a changeable message that is changed by electronic processes or by remote control. The illumination of an advertising device containing a message center display is not the use of a flashing, intermittent, or moving light for the purposes of any rule, regulation, and standard promulgated by the department or any agreement between the department and the secretary of transportation of the United States. No message center display may include any illumination that is in motion or appears to be in motion, that changes in intensity or exposes its message for less than four seconds, or that has an interval between messages of less than one second. No advertising device with a message center display may be placed within one thousand feet of another advertising device with a message center display on the same side of a highway and facing the same direction of travel. No message center display may be placed in violation of section 131 of title 23 of the United States code.

Subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (f) shall not apply if the department receives written notification from the applicable federal authority that the proposed advertising device with a message center display will directly cause the repayment or denial of federal moneys that would otherwise be available or would otherwise be inconsistent with federal law, but only to the extent necessary to prevent the repayment or denial of the moneys or to eliminate the inconsistency with federal law.

Nonconforming advertising devices in compliance with this part 4 and the rules and regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this part 4 may be maintained.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow advertising devices which are prohibited in bonus areas adjacent to the interstate system as provided for in section 43-1-406.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (1) of this section, any advertising device which is more than six hundred sixty feet off the nearest edge of the right-of-way, located outside urban areas as such areas are defined in 23 U.S.C. sec. 101, and which is visible from the roadway of the state highway system and erected with the purpose of its message being read from such roadway is prohibited. Advertising devices beyond six hundred sixty feet of the right-of-way which were lawfully erected under state law prior to January 4, 1975, shall be compensated for and removed pursuant to this part 4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except for section 43-1-416, as an alternative to removing any advertising device that is otherwise permitted by this part 4 or acquiring all real and personal property rights pertaining to the device, the department may permit the advertising device to be remodeled and relocated on the same property in a commercial or industrial zoned area, or on another area where the device would otherwise be permitted under this article.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) shall not apply if the department receives written notification from the applicable federal authority that the proposed advertising device to be remodeled and relocated will directly cause the repayment or denial of federal moneys that would otherwise be available or would otherwise be inconsistent with federal law, but only to the extent necessary to prevent the repayment or denial of the moneys or to eliminate the inconsistency with federal law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2008, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1)(e)(I)(C) amended and (1)(e)(III) added, p. 1662, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 92:

(1)(e)(III) amended, p. 563, § 8, effective March 25.

L. 2002:

(1)(f) and (5) added, pp. 543, 544, §§ 1, 2, effective August 7.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) amended, p. 79, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2010:

IP(1) and (1)(e)(III) amended, (SB 10-158), ch. 231, p. 1014, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(e)(I)(C), (1)(e)(I)(D), and (1)(e)(I)(E) repealed and (1)(e)(I)(B) and (1)(f)(I) amended, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2589, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(1)(e)(III) repealed, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2988, § 95, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-408 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-405. Informational sites authorized.

The department may erect, administer, and maintain informational sites for the display of advertising and information of interest to the traveling public, provided the lease fees are sufficient to pay the costs of erecting, administering, and maintaining the sites.

The department may issue leases for plaques in informational sites.

Leases shall be issued for a period of one year, beginning each January 1, without proration for periods less than a year. Each application for an initial lease or for a renewal of an existing lease shall be accompanied by a fee determined by the department, not to exceed one hundred dollars.

The department may enter into agreements with any governmental entity to lease land in rest areas for the construction, maintenance, and administration of informational sites.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2009, § 1, effective July 1.

43-1-406. Bonus areas.

No person shall erect or maintain or allow to be erected or maintained any advertising device within bonus areas.

As used in this section:

"Acquired for right-of-way" means acquired for right-of-way for any public road by the state, a county, a city, or any other political subdivision of the state by donation, dedication, purchase, condemnation, use, or any other means. The date of acquisition shall be the date upon which title, whether fee title or a lesser interest, vested in the public for right-of-way purposes under applicable state law.

"Bonus areas" means any portion of the area within six hundred sixty feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any portion of the federal interstate system of highways which is constructed upon any part of right-of-way, the entire width of which is acquired for right-of-way after July 1, 1956. A portion shall be deemed so constructed if, within such portion, no line normal or perpendicular to the center line of the highway and extending to both edges of the right-of-way will intersect any right-of-way acquired for right-of-way on or before July 1, 1956. Bonus areas do not include:

Kerr areas, which are segments of the interstate system which traverse commercial or industrial zones within the boundaries of incorporated municipalities, as such boundaries existed on September 21, 1959, wherein the use of real property adjacent to the interstate system is subject to municipal regulation or control, or which traverse other areas where the use of land as of September 21, 1959, was clearly established by state law as industrial or commercial. Signs in Kerr areas are subject to size, lighting, and spacing requirements.

Cotton areas, which are areas adjacent to the interstate system where any part of the highway right-of-way was acquired prior to July 1, 1956. Signs in Cotton areas are prohibited unless such areas are zoned commercial or industrial. Signs in Cotton areas are subject to size, lighting, and spacing requirements.

"Center line of the highway" means a line equidistant from the edges of the median separating the main-traveled ways of a divided interstate highway or the center line of the main-traveled way of a nondivided interstate highway.

A map illustrating the bonus areas shall be maintained for public inspection at reasonable hours in the offices of the department.

The department may remove all advertising devices within bonus areas and may acquire with state funds all real and personal property rights pertaining to advertising devices by gift, purchase, agreement, exchange, or eminent domain. Just compensation shall be paid to the owner of the advertising device for the taking of all right, title, leasehold, and interest in the advertising device and to the owner of the real property on which the advertising device is located for the taking of the right to erect and maintain the device if the advertising device was lawfully erected.

The following are exempt from the provisions of this section but must in all respects comply with applicable rules issued by the department:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

Advertising devices located in a Kerr area; and

Advertising devices located in a Cotton area.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2010, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(5)(a) amended, p. 79, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2021:

(5) amended, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2590, § 3, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-413 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-407. Permits.

A permit from the department is required for the erection or maintenance of the following advertising devices:

Each nonconforming advertising device as defined in section 43-1-403 (12); and

Repealed.

Each advertising device allowed pursuant to section 43-1-404 (1)(d) and (1)(e). Renewals of such permits are subject to the provisions of section 43-1-409.

Any other provision of law notwithstanding, the department shall issue a permit to erect or maintain an advertising device on a bus bench or bus shelter located either within the right-of-way of any state highway or on land adjacent to or visible from the right-of-way of any state highway if the local governing body having authority over the state highway pursuant to section 43-2-135 has approved such advertising device. The state shall accept the local permit as a state approved permit if the approval procedure of the local governing body included a determination that the advertising device does not restrict pedestrian traffic and is not a safety hazard to the motoring public.
(2) (a) (I) Any other provision of law notwithstanding, the department shall issue a permit to erect or maintain an advertising device on a bus bench or bus shelter located either within the right-of-way of any state highway or on land adjacent to or visible from the right-of-way of any state highway if the local governing body having authority over the state highway pursuant to section 43-2-135 has approved such advertising device. The state shall accept the local permit as a state approved permit if the approval procedure of the local governing body included a determination that the advertising device does not restrict pedestrian traffic and is not a safety hazard to the motoring public.

Except for safety requirements for bus benches or bus shelters located within the right-of-way of any state highway, the department shall not impose any additional requirements or more strict requirements in connection with permits for advertising devices on a bus bench or bus shelter than those imposed by the local governing body unless specifically required by federal law.

The department shall implement this subsection (2) with the purpose of promoting the use of bus transportation.

This subsection (2) shall not apply if the department receives written notification from the applicable federal authority that compliance with this subsection (2) will directly cause denial of federal moneys that would otherwise be available or would otherwise be inconsistent with federal law, but only to the extent necessary to prevent denial of the moneys or to eliminate the inconsistency with federal law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2011, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1342, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 776, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2001:

(2) amended, p. 410, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended and (1)(b) repealed, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2590, § 4, effective June 30.

43-1-408. Application for permit - contents - rules.

Application for a permit for each advertising device must be made on a form provided by the department, signed by the applicant or the applicant's duly authorized officer or agent, and include:

The name and address of the owner of the advertising device;

The type, location, and dimensions of the advertising device, and such other pertinent information as may be prescribed;

The name and address of the lessor of property upon which the device has been or will be located and a copy of the lease agreement or letter of consent;

Repealed.

An agreement by the applicant to erect and maintain the advertising device in a safe, sound, and good condition; and

For all devices erected on or after July 1, 1981, certification from the local zoning administrator or authority that the advertising device conforms to local zoning requirements or a copy of a local government permit for the device;

For devices erected prior to July 1, 1981, an affidavit from the sign owner that the advertising device was lawfully erected under local law.

Upon the department's receipt of a complete application for a permit which satisfies each of the requirements in subsection (1) of this section and otherwise meets the department's conditions, the department has thirty days to issue, by first-class mail to the address provided by the applicant, either a permit or a preliminary decision denying the application for permit.

The applicant may appeal any preliminary decision denying the application for a permit by requesting a hearing in writing within thirty days of the department mailing the notice of the denial of the application for a permit to the applicant. If the applicant timely appeals, the matter must proceed in accordance with the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, though the department may, by rule, create procedures for expedited review of denials and issuance of final agency decisions if the applicant consents to the expedited review.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2011, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (1)(e) amended, (1)(d) repealed, and (2) and (3) added, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2591, § 5, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-414 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-409. Permit term - renewal - fees.

Applications for renewal of permits shall be made before June 1 of each year and shall be issued for a one-year period beginning July 1 and ending June 30. Permits shall be issued without proration for periods of less than one year. If the sign authorized by a permit is not erected within one year from the date the permit was issued, then the permit is void as of one year from the date it was issued.

Each application for a permit or renewal of a permit shall be accompanied by a permit fee for each advertising device, in accordance with the following schedule:

Sign size 100 square feet of face area or less ....................
$10.00

Sign size 101 square feet of face area to

250 square feet of face area ....................
$20.00

Sign size 251 square feet of face area to

600 square feet of face area ....................
$40.00

Sign size 601 square feet of face area or more ....................
$75.00

No permit renewals from the department shall be required for any advertising device erected in an area zoned for industrial or commercial use where the local zoning authority has entered into an agreement of certification with the department and where the local zoning authority has enacted rules, regulations, or ordinances concerning the control of advertising devices in industrial or commercial areas that are at least as restrictive as this part 4 and the rules and regulations promulgated under this part 4 as to size, lighting, spacing, use, and maintenance. As used in this subsection (2), an "agreement of certification" means the local zoning authority agrees to: Enforce its rules, regulations, or ordinances concerning outdoor advertising devices or billboards; require a permit be obtained from the department before any new device is erected within the certification area; require a new permit be obtained from the department before any material change is made to a device in existence at the time of certification; tender to the department semiannually inspection records and records of actions taken on violations. If the department determines after public hearing that the local zoning authority has failed to comply with its agreement of certification, the department may rescind the agreement of certification by serving a written decision on the local zoning authority by certified mail. The decision of the department shall constitute final agency action. Upon rescission the department shall require all permit holders to renew their permits unless the device is otherwise in violation of this part 4 in which case the department shall proceed pursuant to section 43-1-412.

Renewal applications may be made by reference to the identifying number of the permit being renewed only, in the absence of material change in the information shown by the original application.

The name of the owner of the advertising device for which a permit has been issued and the identifying permit number assigned by the department shall be placed in a conspicuous place on each advertising device structure within thirty days after the date of issuance of the permit.

The permit holder shall, during the term thereof, have the right to change the advertising copy, ornamentation, or trim on the structure or sign for which it was issued without payment of any additional fee. The permit holder shall also have the right and obligation to repair, replace, and maintain in good condition any damaged advertising device structure, however caused, if the right to maintain any nonconforming advertising device has not been terminated pursuant to section 43-1-413.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1342, § 2, effective July 1, 1992.)

Any permit holder or new owner shall, within sixty days of purchasing, selling, or otherwise transferring ownership in any advertising device for which a permit is required by this part 4, send a written notice of such fact to the department and shall include in such notice the name and address of the purchaser or transferee and its permit number.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2012, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(a) and (6) amended, p. 1342, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-415 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-410. Denial or revocation of permit or renewal.

A permit under this part 4 may be denied or revoked, or a renewal denied, for false or misleading information given in the application for such permit or renewal or for the erection or maintenance of an advertising device in violation of the provisions of this part 4 or in violation of the rules and regulations of the department promulgated to enforce and administer this part 4.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2013, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-416 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-411. Issuance of permits prohibited - when.

No permit shall be issued for the erection, use, or maintenance of any advertising device which is or would be:

At a point where it would encroach upon the right-of-way of a public highway without written approval of the department;

Along the highway within five hundred feet of the center point of an intersection of such highway at grade with another highway or with a railroad in such manner as materially to obstruct or reduce the existing view of traffic on the other highway or railroad trains approaching the intersection and within five hundred feet of such center point;

Along a highway at any point where it would reduce the existing view of traffic in either direction or of traffic control or official highway signs to less than five hundred feet;

Designed, used, or intended to be designed or used to include more than two advertising panels on an advertising device facing in the same direction.

On or after July 1, 1981, no permit shall be issued for any advertising device which required a permit under state law prior to July 1, 1981, and for which no permit was obtained.

No permit shall be issued for any advertising device which simulates any official, directional, or warning sign erected or maintained by the United States, this state, or any county or municipality or which involves light simulating or resembling traffic signals or traffic control signs.

No permit shall be issued for any advertising device nailed, tacked, posted, or attached in any manner on trees, perennial plants, rocks, or other natural objects or on fences or fence posts or poles maintained by public utilities.

No permit shall be issued nor any renewal issued for any advertising device which becomes decayed, insecure, or in danger of falling or otherwise is unsafe or unsightly by reason of lack of maintenance or repair, or from any other cause.

No permit shall be issued for any advertising device which does not conform to size, lighting, and spacing standards as prescribed by rules and regulations adopted by the department, where such rules and regulations were adopted prior to the erection of said device.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2013, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(d) amended, p. 411, § 2, effective April 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-418 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-412. Notice of noncompliance - removal authorized.

Any outdoor advertising device which does not comply with this part 4 and the rules and regulations issued by the department shall be subject to removal as provided in this section.

If no permit has been obtained for the advertising device as required by this part 4, the department shall give written notice by certified mail to the owner of the property on which the advertising device is located informing the landowner that the device is illegal and requiring the landowner within sixty days of receipt of the notice to remove the device, execute an affidavit under the penalty of perjury as evidence that said device is not an advertising device as defined in section 43-1-403 (1), or obtain a proper permit. The written notice must advise the owner of the right to request the department to conduct a hearing.

If no application for renewal of a permit is received by the department as required by this part 4, the department shall give written notice by certified mail to the permittee requiring him within sixty days of receipt of the notice to apply for a renewal permit and pay an additional late fee of fifty dollars or remove the advertising device and advising him of the right to request the department to conduct a hearing.

If the department determines that an application for renewal permit should be denied or that an existing permit should be revoked, the department shall give written notice by certified mail to the applicant or permittee specifying in what respect he has failed to comply with the requirements of this part 4 and requiring him within sixty days of receipt of the notice to remove the device or correct the violation if correction is permissible pursuant to this part 4 and advising him of the right to request the department to conduct a hearing.

A request for a hearing shall be made in writing and must be received by the department no later than sixty days after receipt of notice. Such hearings shall be held pursuant to the "State Administrative Procedure Act".

After the sixty-day notice period has expired, the department is authorized to make a determination with or without hearing that the device is or is not in compliance with this part 4. If the department determines the device is not in compliance with this part 4 and the rules and regulations promulgated under this part 4, it shall issue an order setting forth the provisions violated, the facts alleged to constitute the violation, and the time by which the device must be removed at the party's expense. The order shall be served upon the party by certified mail.

If the party does not remove the device as ordered, the department is authorized to remove the device forthwith. If the landowner does not consent to entry upon the land by the department to remove the device and no party has sought judicial review pursuant to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", the department may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an order allowing the department to enter upon the land for the purpose of removing the device forthwith. The court shall issue such order upon proof the device has not been removed and judicial review has not been sought.

Upon removal of an advertising device pursuant to this section, neither the owner of the property upon which the advertising device was erected nor the department shall be liable in damages to anyone who claims to be the owner of the advertising device who has not obtained a permit. The department shall not be responsible for damages otherwise created by the removal of said advertising device or for its destruction subsequent to removal.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2014, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2591, § 6, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-417 as it existed prior to 1981.

Cross references:

For the "State Administrative Procedure Act", see article 4 of title 24.

43-1-413. Nonconforming advertising devices.

A nonconforming advertising device may be continued to be maintained at the same location at which the nonconforming advertising device was lawfully erected.

The right to maintain any nonconforming advertising device shall be terminated by:

Abandonment of the nonconforming advertising device;

Increase of any dimension of the nonconforming advertising device;

Change of any aspect of or in the character of the nonconforming device;

Failure to comply with the provisions of this part 4, concerning permits for the maintenance of advertising devices;

Damage to or destruction of the nonconforming advertising device from any cause whatsoever, except willful destruction, where the cost of repairing the damage or destruction exceeds fifty percent of the cost of such device on the date of damage or destruction, as determined by the department-approved schedule of compensation;

Obsolescence of the nonconforming advertising device where the cost of repairing the device exceeds fifty percent of the replacement cost of such device on the date that the department determines said device is obsolete.

Reasonable and customary repair and maintenance of the device, including a change of advertising message or design, is not a change that would violate subsection (2) of this section. However, such message or design change shall not be compensable under section 43-1-414.

If the right to maintain any nonconforming advertising device is terminated under this section, the advertising device shall become illegal and shall be removed pursuant to section 43-1-412.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2015, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, p. 256, § 2, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-422 as it existed prior to 1981.